Utah statutes.
32B-4-202.   Duties to enforce this title.

(1)  It is the duty of the following to diligently enforce this title in their respective capacities:

(a)  the governor;

(b)  a commissioner;

(c)  the director;

(d)  an official, inspector, or department employee;

(e)  a prosecuting official of the state or its political subdivisions;

(f)  a county, city, or town;

(g)  a peace officer, sheriff, deputy sheriff, constable, marshal, or law enforcement official;

(h)  a state health official; and

(i)  a clerk of the court.

(2)  Immediately upon conviction of a person for violation of this title or of a local ordinance relating to an alcoholic product, it is the duty of the clerk of the court to notify the department of the conviction in writing on forms supplied by the department.

